Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB917.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 3735 of Title 75 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a subsection to read:§ 3735. Homicide by vehicle while driving under influence.* * *(c) Sentencing enhancement.--The Pennsylvania Commission on Sentencing, under 42 Pa.C.S. § 2154 (relating to adoption of guidelines for sentencing), shall provide for a sentencing enhancement for the offense under this section if the following are found in the defendant's blood or breath in violation of section 3802:(1) multiple controlled substances specified under section 3802(d)(1); or(2) alcohol and at least one controlled substance 12345678910111213141516171819 specified under section 3802(d)(1).Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0917PN1093 - 2 - 12